Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-622
Governmental agency, defined.

Governmental agency means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government or of a state or a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a state.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 384.